Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.110

Judgment against corporation—Costs—Receivership.

If judgment be rendered against any corporation or against any persons claiming to be a corporation, the court may cause the costs to be collected by executions against the persons claiming to be a corporation or by attachment against the directors or other officers of the corporation, and shall restrain the corporation, take an account, and make a distribution thereof among the creditors. The prosecuting attorney shall immediately institute proceedings for that purpose.

[ 2004 c 165 s 38; Code 1881 s 712; 1877 p 144 s 716; 1854 p 217 s 479; RRS s 1044.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.